xx: CE
en: CE, CE marking
fr: CE, Marquage CE

en: OEKO-TEX
xx: OEKO-TEX

en: OEKO-TEX Made In Green
xx: OEKO-TEX Made In Green

en: OEKO-TEX Standard 100, OEKO Tex Standard 100
xx: OEKO-TEX Standard 100, OEKO Tex Standard 100

en: Fair Wear Foundation
xx: Fair Wear Foundation
fr: Fair Wear Foundation

xx: Energy Star
en: Energy Star
fr: Energy Star

xx: EPEAT
en: EPEAT
fr: EPEAT

xx: FCC
en: FCC, FCC certification
fr: FCC, Certification FCC

xx: RoHS
en: RoHS, RoHS compliant
fr: RoHS, Conforme RoHS

xx: WEEE
en: WEEE
fr: DEEE

xx: UKCA, UK Conformity Assessed
en: UKCA, UKCA marking
de: UKCA, UKCA-Kennzeichnung

xx: UKNI, UK(NI)
en: UKNI, UKNI marking

xx: ICASA Approved
en: ICASA Approved

en: Battery included
ar: بطارية مشمولة
de: Batterie enthalten
es: Batería incluida
fr: Pile incluse
it: Batteria inclusa
ja: バッテリー付属
ko: 배터리 포함
nl: Batterij inbegrepen
pl: Bateria w zestawie
pt: Bateria incluída
ru: Батарея в комплекте
zh: 包括电池

en: Contains rechargeable battery
ar: يحتوي على بطارية قابلة للشحن
de: Enthält wiederaufladbare Batterie
es: Contiene batería recargable
fr: Contient une batterie rechargeable
it: Contiene batteria ricaricabile
ja: 充電式バッテリーが含まれています
ko: 충전식 배터리 포함
nl: Bevat oplaadbare batterij
pl: Zawiera akumulator
pt: Contém bateria recarregável
ru: Содержит аккумуляторную батарею
zh: 包含可充电电池

en: Without perfume
da: Uden parfume
de: Ohne Parfüm
es: Sin perfume
fr: Sans parfum
it: Senza profumo
nb: Uten parfyme
nl: Zonder parfum
pl: Bez perfum
pt: Sem perfume
sv: Utan parfym

xx: Asthma Allergy Nordic
en: Asthma Allergy Nordic

xx: Nordic Swan Ecolabel, Nordic Ecolabel
en: Nordic Swan Ecolabel, Nordic Ecolabel
da: Svanemærket, Nordisk miljømærkning
fi: Joutsenmerkki, pohjoismainen ympäristömerkki, ympäristömerkki, ympäristömerkki miljömärkt
is: Svansmerkið, Svanurinn, Umhverfismerkið Svanurinn
nb: Svanemerket, miljømerket
sv: Svanenmärkt, Svanen, Svanenmärkt miljömärkt

en: Assembled in Europe
ar: جمع في أوروبا
de: Zusammengebaut in Europa
es: Montado en Europa
fr: Assemblé en Europe
it: Assemblato in Europa
ja: ヨーロッパで組み立て
ko: 유럽에서 조립
nl: Geassembleerd in Europa
pl: Zmontowano w Europie
pt: Montado na Europa
ru: Собрано в Европе
zh: 欧洲组装

en: Assembled in Germany
de: Zusammengebaut in Deutschland
es: Montado en Alemania
fr: Assemblé en Allemagne
it: Assemblato in Germania
ja: ドイツで組み立て
ko: 독일에서 조립
nl: Geassembleerd in Duitsland
pl: Zmontowano w Niemczech
pt: Montado na Alemanha
ru: Собрано в Германии
zh: 德国组装